src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! !!!Buryaad proper noun morphology

!! This file add +N+Prop and points to the noun case morphology

LEXICON PROPX ! unclassified
PROP1 ;

LEXICON PROP1
+N+Prop+Sg: case1 ;
!+N+Pl:%>ууд case1 ;

LEXICON PROP2
+N+Prop+Sg: case2 ;
!+N+Pl:%>ууд case2 ;
